Utah statutes.
58-60-205.5.   Continuing education.

As a condition for renewal of a license under this part, a social service worker licensee shall, during each two-year licensure cycle, complete qualified continuing professional education, as defined by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Enacted by Chapter 214, 2010 General Session

